Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.474

Substance use prevention and awareness materials—Distribution.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with the department of health, the health care authority, other state agencies, and educational service districts to develop age-appropriate substance use prevention and awareness materials for school and classroom uses. These materials must be periodically updated to align with substance use prevention and awareness campaigns implemented by the department of health and the health care authority.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall actively distribute the materials developed under subsection (1) of this section to school districts, public schools, educational service districts, and community-based organizations that provide extended learning opportunities, and strongly encourage the incorporation of age-appropriate materials in classrooms, as well as in family and community communications.

[ 2024 c 201 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—Short title—2024 c 201: See notes following RCW 43.70.775.